Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.262

Application of administrative procedure act.

Chapter 34.05 RCW governs the rights, remedies, and procedures respecting the administration of this chapter, including rule making, assessment of civil penalties, emergency actions, and license suspension, revocation, or denial.

[ 2000 c 144 s 3.]